District of Columbia statutes.
7-1633

Program administration.

(a)

The Department shall:

(1)

Administer the Program;

(2)

Recruit seniors to participate in the Program;

(3)

Determine the training curriculum; and

(4)

Schedule no fewer than 8 education or community-outreach events annually, which shall be led by seniors who have successfully completed the Program. Each year, at least one event shall be held in each ward.

(b)

The Department may contract with a community provider to train the seniors participating in the Program.

(c)

Subject to the availability of funds, the Department may provide a stipend to Program participants.

July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-152, § 4, 59 DCR 5136